California statutes. Civil Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.28.

This title shall become operative on October 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Construction and Definitions [1784.30. - 1784.31.]

1784.30.

This title shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes, which are to protect purchasers and lessees of new or used motor vehicles against unfair and deceptive business practices and to provide efficient and economical procedures to secure that protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.31.

The following definitions apply for purposes of this title:

(a) “Add-on” or “add-on product or service” means any product or service not provided to the purchaser or lessee or installed on the vehicle by the vehicle manufacturer and for which the dealer, directly or indirectly, charges a purchaser or lessee in connection with a vehicle sale, lease, or financing transaction.

(b) “Auction” means a sale transaction conducted by means of oral, written, or electronic exchanges whereby offers are solicited from one or more potential purchasers in the form of bids in an effort to advance the amount of the bids to obtain the highest
 and most favorable offer. 

(c) “Dealer” means a licensed California motor vehicle dealer or a dealer as defined in Section 285 of the Vehicle Code. 

(d) “GAP agreement” means an agreement for either of the following:

(1) To indemnify a vehicle purchaser or lessee for the difference between the actual cash value of the vehicle in the event of an unrecovered theft or total loss and the amount owed on the vehicle pursuant to the terms of a loan, lease agreement, or installment sales contract used to purchase or lease the vehicle.

(2) To waive the unpaid difference between money received from the purchaser’s or lessee’s vehicle insurer and some or all of the
 amount owed on the vehicle at the time of the unrecovered theft or total loss, including products or services titled “guaranteed automobile protection agreement,” “guaranteed asset protection agreement,” “GAP insurance,” or “GAP waiver.” 

(e) “Material” or “materially” means likely to affect a person’s choice of, or conduct regarding, goods or services.

(f) (1) “Motor vehicle” or “vehicle” means a motor vehicle as defined by Section 415 of the Vehicle Code. 

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), “motor vehicle” or “vehicle” does not include any of the following:

(A) Vehicles that are sold wholesale. For purposes of this subparagraph, “wholesale”
 means sale of a vehicle that does not constitute a retail sale, as defined in Section 6007 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) Vehicles that are not required to be registered under the Vehicle Code.

(C) Fleet sale transactions. For purposes of this subparagraph, “fleet sale” means the sale of more than one vehicle as part of a single transaction for use primarily for business or commercial purposes.

(D) Sales to commercial purchasers. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “commercial purchasers” means a person that purchases five or more vehicles from the dealer per year for use primarily for business or commercial purposes.

(E) A vehicle that
 has a gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds or more.

(g) “Restocking fee” means the following fees that the dealer may charge a buyer or lessee who exercises the three-day right to cancel:

(1) (A) One and one-half percent of the sale price of the vehicle, but not less than two hundred dollars ($200) and not more than six hundred dollars ($600).

(B) In lieu of the fee in subparagraph (A), a dealer that charged the buyer or lessee a shipping fee for transporting
 the vehicle may retain the cost the dealer actually incurred for shipping, provided that the amount retained does not exceed the amount that would otherwise be permitted under subparagraph (A). The dealer shall refund to the buyer or lessee the balance, if any, between the amounts charged and retained.

(2) If the vehicle has been driven over 250 miles, the dealer may also charge the buyer or lessee an additional one dollar ($1) for each mile over 250 miles, but this amount shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(h) “Service contract” includes products that provide consumers with some type of benefit or payment for repair, maintenance, or service on the vehicle purchased or leased.

(i) (1) “Three-day,” as used in the phrase “three-day right to cancel,” means the period in which a buyer or lessee of a used vehicle may exercise the right to cancel the purchase or lease as provided in Section 1784.43. Except as provided in paragraph (2), this period consists of the three calendar day period commencing the calendar day after the purchase or lease is executed.

(2) If the third day in the three calendar day period described in paragraph (1) falls on a day the dealership is closed to the public, the three-day right to cancel period extends to the next day the dealership is open to the public.

(3) The three-day right to cancel ends at the close of business on the last day of the period described in this subdivision. 

(j) (1) “Total price” means the total sale price of a vehicle, excluding the taxes, fees, and charges described in subdivision (e)
 of Section 11713.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) “Total price” includes any dealer price adjustment and the cost of any item installed on the vehicle at the time of the advertisement or communication.

(3) “Total price” does not include any deduction for a rebate.

(k) (1) “Used motor vehicle” or “used vehicle” means a vehicle, as defined by subdivision (f), that also satisfies the definition of a “used vehicle” as defined in Section 665 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) “Used motor vehicle” does not include a motorcycle, as defined in Section 400 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Prohibited Conduct and Consumer Rights  [1784.40. - 1784.44.]

1784.40.

It is a violation of this title for any dealer to make any misrepresentation regarding material information about any of the following:

(a) The costs or terms of purchasing, financing, or leasing a vehicle.

(b) Any costs, limitation, benefit, or any other aspect of an add-on product or service.

(c) Whether the final contract is for the lease or sale of a motor vehicle. This subdivision shall not be construed to restrict the ability of a dealer to present multiple financing and lease payment options to the customer prior to the sale or lease of a motor vehicle.

(d) The availability of vehicles at a total price communicated by the dealer. A dealer is not in violation of this subdivision if the advertisement in question is withdrawn following the sale of the vehicle in compliance with subdivision (c) of Section 11713 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) Whether any consumer has been or will be preapproved or guaranteed for any product, service, or term.

(f) Information on or about a consumer’s application for financing.

(g) Whether the dealer will keep cash downpayments or trade-in vehicles, charge fees, or initiate legal process, or any action if a transaction is not finalized or if the consumer does not go forward with the
 transaction.

(h) Whether, and if so, when, a dealer will pay off some or all of the financing or a lease on a consumer’s trade-in vehicle, and what happens if a dealer fails to pay off the trade-in vehicle within the time period required by Section 11709.4 of the Vehicle Code.

(i) The remedy available if a dealer fails to sell or lease a vehicle at the total price.

(j) Whether the dealer or any of the dealer’s personnel or products or services is or was affiliated with, endorsed or approved by, or otherwise associated with the United States government or any federal, state, or local governmental agency, unit, or department, including the United States Department of Defense or its military departments.

(k) Whether, or under what circumstances, a vehicle may be repossessed.

(l) Whether a vehicle can be moved outside of California or outside of the United States.

(m) Any of the required disclosures identified in this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.41.

It is a violation of this title for any dealer to fail to make any disclosure required by this section clearly and conspicuously.

(a) In connection with the sale or financing of a vehicle, a vehicle’s total price shall be disclosed as follows:

(1) In any advertisement that references a specific vehicle for sale.

(2) In any advertisement that represents any monetary amount or financing term for a specific vehicle.

(3) In the first written communication with a consumer that includes a reference
 regarding a specific vehicle for sale, or any monetary amount or financing term for any vehicle. With respect to the first written communication, both of the following apply:

(A) The total price for the vehicle shall be disclosed at least once in the dealer’s first response regarding that specific vehicle to the consumer.

(B) A dealer shall retain a copy of the communication identified by this paragraph for at least two years and shall provide a copy of the communication to the customer upon written request.

(b) When making any written representation during the negotiation to purchase or lease a specific vehicle about an add-on product or service, the dealer shall disclose at least once that the add-on is not required and
 the consumer can purchase or lease the vehicle without the add-on. This disclosure shall be in writing and shall be clear and conspicuous. If the transaction is negotiated
 primarily in a language identified by subdivision (b) of Section 1632, the disclosure required by this paragraph shall also be provided in that language.

(c) (1) When making any written representation during the negotiation to purchase or lease a specific vehicle about a monthly payment for any vehicle, the dealer shall disclose at least once, clearly and conspicuously and in writing, the total amount the consumer will pay to purchase or lease the vehicle at that monthly payment after making all payments as scheduled.

(2) If the total amount disclosed assumes the consumer will provide consideration, including in the form of a cash downpayment or trade-in valuation, the dealer shall disclose the amount of consideration to be provided by the
 consumer. This disclosure shall be in writing and shall be clear and conspicuous. If the transaction is negotiated primarily in a language identified by subdivision (b) of Section 1632, the disclosure required by this paragraph shall also be provided in that language.

(d) If the dealer makes any written comparison between payment options during the negotiation to purchase or lease a specific vehicle that includes discussion of lower monthly payments, the dealer shall disclose that lower monthly payments often increase the total amount the consumer will pay to purchase or lease the vehicle. Use of an internet-based tool that allows consumers to adjust financing parameters shall not constitute a violation of this section.

(e) The disclosures required by subdivisions (b), (c), and (d)
 may be incorporated into a document that includes the written disclosures required by Section 2982.2.

(f) Subdivision (a) shall not be construed to modify vehicle advertising requirements in Section 11713.1 or Section 11713.16 of the Vehicle Code. This includes, but is not limited to, the advertisement or communication of rebates and incentives that are disclosed separately from a vehicle’s total price.

(g) This section shall not apply to a used vehicle sold at an auction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.42.

It is a violation of this title for any dealer, in connection with the sale or financing of vehicles, to charge for any of the following.

(a) A dealer may not charge for an add-on product or service if the vehicle purchaser or lessee would not benefit from the add-on product or service, including, as applicable, any of the following:

(1) Nitrogen-filled tire-related products or services that contain less than 95-percent nitrogen purity.

(2) Products or services that do not provide coverage for the vehicle, the consumer, or the transaction.

(3) A GAP agreement that is not in compliance with Section 2982, 2982.2, or 2982.12.

(4) A service contract if the service contract is void due to preexisting conditions, including prior damage from a crash or flood or preexisting mechanical conditions.

(5) Oil changes for electric vehicles.

(6) Catalytic converter markings for a vehicle that does not have a catalytic converter.

(7) Surface protection product that renders the manufacturer’s warranty for the paint job void.

(b) A dealer shall pay the person or entity who is supposed to provide
 the benefit of the add-on within 10 days of the date when the car buyer or lessee signs the purchase or lease, unless the dealer has an agreement with the person or entity that provides for payment at a later date and the buyer’s or lessee’s coverage is not impacted by the later payment.

(c) This section does not prohibit a dealer from charging for an add-on product or service, such as a service contract, if the add-on product or service is selected by, and would benefit, the vehicle purchaser or lessee, even if the vehicle purchaser or lessee ultimately does not choose to use the add-on product or service, and even if the vehicle purchaser or lessee does not use the add-on product or service because a coverage event does not occur.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.43.

(a) (1) (A) A dealer shall not sell or lease a used vehicle at retail at a price equal to or less than fifty thousand dollars
 ($50,000) without providing the buyer or lessee with a three-day right to cancel the purchase or lease.

(B) The right to cancel does not apply if the used vehicle has been driven more than 400 miles between the execution of the sale or lease agreement and the date on which the buyer or lessee attempts to exercise the right.

(2) (A) A dealer may charge a buyer or lessee who exercises the right to cancel a restocking fee. Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the dealer may collect the restocking fee on the date the buyer or lessee exercises the right to cancel.

(B) (i) If the buyer or lessee is entitled to any refund, the restocking fee shall be deducted from the
 refund.

(ii) If the refund does not cover the full amount of the restocking fee, the balance is due at the time the buyer or lessee exercises the right to cancel.

(3) (A) If the right to cancel is exercised, the dealer shall return the buyer’s or lessee’s trade-in vehicle and all keys the buyer or lessee provided, if any, unless the dealer has sold or otherwise initiated the process to transfer the title of the trade-in vehicle, in which case the refund for the trade-in vehicle is the greater of the following:

(i) The agreed-upon value of the trade-in vehicle in the sales or lease agreement.

(ii) The amount for which the dealer sold the
 trade-in vehicle.

(iii) The fair market value of the trade-in vehicle.

(B) The dealer may deduct from the amount required by subparagraph (A) the amount necessary to satisfy outstanding indebtedness secured by the trade-in vehicle. The dealer shall provide the buyer or lessee a receipt documenting the cancellation that includes an itemized breakdown of the basis for each deduction. The receipt shall include the date and time when the buyer or lessee exercised the right to cancel.

(C) For the purposes of clause (iii) of subparagraph (A), the dealer shall have a rebuttable presumption of establishing the fair market value by either of the two valuation methods:

(i) The valuation equals the amount identified in a written offer to purchase the trade-in vehicle received by the buyer or lessee, and honored by the dealer, and that offer is valid for at least seven days.

(ii) The valuation equals the vehicle’s trade-in valuation when the right to cancel was exercised, as identified in a nationally recognized pricing guide selected by the dealer, and considering the vehicle’s condition at the time the vehicle was traded in. For the purposes of this clause, “nationally recognized pricing guide” has the same meaning as paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11950 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 2981.9 of the Civil Code, a dealer shall provide the buyer or lessee of a used vehicle subject to the right to cancel
 a copy of a disclosure titled “3-Day Right to Cancel Used Car Purchase or Lease” on a separate document. If the transaction is negotiated primarily in a language identified by subdivision (b) of Section 1632, the disclosure required by this subdivision shall also be provided in that language. The disclosure shall clearly and conspicuously contain all of the following:

(1) The name of the selling or leasing dealer and the buyer or lessee.

(2) A description and the vehicle identification number of the vehicle purchased.

(3) A statement specifying the time within which the buyer or lessee must exercise the right to cancel the sale or lease and return the vehicle to the dealer.

(4) A statement that although the dealer cannot charge the buyer or lessee for the right to cancel the purchase or lease, the dealer may charge the buyer or lessee a restocking fee. The statement shall describe how both components of the restocking fee are calculated.

(5) A statement that the buyer or lessee cannot exercise the right to cancel if the vehicle has been driven more than 400 miles.

(6) A statement that the right to cancel applies only if all of the following are personally delivered to the selling or leasing dealer during business hours by the buyer or lessee at the time the right to cancel is exercised:

(A) Restocking fees, except to the extent they are deducted from any refund as required by this
 section.

(B) The vehicle, meeting both of the following:

(i) Free of all liens and encumbrances, other than any lien or encumbrance created by or incidental to the sales or lease transaction.

(ii) In the same condition as when it was delivered by the dealer to the buyer or lessee, except reasonable wear and tear and any defect or mechanical problem that manifests or becomes evident after delivery that was not caused by the buyer or lessee. The dealer shall maintain documentation describing any damage beyond reasonable wear and tear.

(C) Any other cash or items received by the buyer or lessee in
 connection with the sale or lease of the vehicle.

(7) A statement that the dealer may require the buyer or lessee to execute documents reasonably necessary to effectuate the cancellation and refund and as reasonably required to comply with applicable law.

(8) (A) A statement that if the dealer has sold or otherwise initiated the process to transfer title of the buyer’s or lessee’s trade-in vehicle, the dealer shall pay the buyer or lessee the greater of the following:

(i) The agreed-upon value of the trade-in vehicle in the sales or lease agreement.

(ii) The amount for which the dealer sold the trade-in vehicle.

(iii) The fair market value of the trade-in vehicle.

(B) A statement that the amount of the refund may be reduced as necessary to satisfy outstanding indebtedness secured by the trade-in vehicle. 

(9) A statement that if the dealer represents to the buyer or lessee that it sold the trade-in vehicle, it must provide the buyer or lessee a copy of the document showing the sale of the trade-in vehicle. The dealer shall redact the personal information of the person or entity to whom the trade-in vehicle was sold.

(c) It is a violation of this title for any dealer, in connection with a buyer or lessee exercising the right to cancel, to do any of the
 following:

(1) Anything to impede a buyer or lessee from exercising the right to cancel the purchase or lease of a vehicle as provided in this title.

(2) Overcharge the buyer or lessee for the restocking fee.

(3) Withhold the buyer’s or lessee’s downpayment or trade-in vehicle after the right to cancel has been exercised.

(4) Fail to timely refund the buyer’s or lessee’s downpayment after the right to cancel has been exercised.

(5) Fail to refund the amount owed for the buyer’s or lessee’s trade-in vehicle if the trade-in vehicle has been sold.

(6) Fail to provide the buyer or lessee the receipt or contract for the sale of the buyer’s or lessee’s trade-in vehicle.

(7) Claim damage to the vehicle in excess of reasonable wear and tear without reasonable basis.

(8) Claim the person authorized to return the buyer’s or lessee’s downpayment or trade-in vehicle is not available.

(d) (1) No later than 48 hours after the buyer or lessee exercises the right to cancel pursuant to this section, the dealer shall cancel the contract and provide the buyer or lessee with a full refund, minus any deduction allowed by this section. The dealer is not responsible for any delays outside the control of the dealer, including delays attributable to the
 processing of a refund by a bank, credit card company, or other financial institution.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), in the event the buyer or lessee made a payment through a method that does not result in an immediate verified transfer of funds to the dealer, such as a check, the dealer may delay providing the refund until two business days after the buyer or lessee’s payment is verified. The dealer shall provide the buyer or lessee with documentation showing when the verification occurred.

(e) The dealer will clearly and conspicuously disclose on the first page of the purchase or lease agreement the following:
“CALIFORNIA DOES NOT HAVE A COOLING-OFF PERIOD FOR NEW VEHICLES. HOWEVER, IF YOU PURCHASED
 OR LEASED A USED VEHICLE FOR $50,000 OR LESS, YOU HAVE 3 DAYS TO CANCEL THIS CONTRACT FOR ANY REASON. ADDITIONAL RESTRICTIONS MAY APPLY, INCLUDING A RESTOCKING FEE.
 You have up to 3 days to return the vehicle to the dealer and cancel this contract and obtain a refund. Please review the disclosure, which the dealer is required by law to provide, for the details about this right and how to exercise it.”
(f) This section does not affect the ability of a buyer to rescind the contract or revoke acceptance under any other law.

(g) This section does not apply to a used vehicle with a purchase price greater than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(h) This section does not apply
 to the sale of a leased vehicle to the lessee if the lessee is in possession of the vehicle prior to the time of the sale.

(i) This section does not apply to a used vehicle sold at an auction, provided the used vehicle is in compliance with the requirements of Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000) of the Vehicle Code.

(j) This section shall not be construed to limit the ability of a dealer to offer a right to cancel that provides greater consumer protections than those outlined in this section, including a right to cancel for additional vehicles, a longer return period, or reduced restocking fees. In such circumstances, the dealer may elect to make corresponding changes that describe these greater consumer protections in any consumer notice required by this section or Section
 11709.2 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------

1784.44.

(a) A dealer subject to this title shall create and retain, for a period of two years from the date the record is created, all records necessary to demonstrate compliance with this title, including the following records:

(1) Records demonstrating that communications and advertisements of a vehicle’s total price meet the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 1784.41. For purposes of this paragraph, “advertisement” includes internet-based listings that display a vehicle’s total price, features, or financing terms disseminated by the dealer. This paragraph shall not require retention of records generated solely by interactive tools that allow consumers to adjust variables
 such as downpayment, credit tier, interest rate, or loan term to receive personalized financing estimates, provided the tools do not alter or misrepresent the vehicle’s total price as advertised.

(2) Copies of all purchase orders, financing and lease documents with the dealer signed by the consumer, whether or not final approval or assignment of the contract is received from a financing or lease transaction, and all written communications relating to sales, financing, or leasing between the dealer and any car buyer or lessee who signs a purchase order or financing or lease contract with the dealer.

(3) Records demonstrating that add-ons in a consumer’s contract meet the requirements of Section 1784.42, including copies of all service contracts, GAP agreements, proof of timely
 payment for add-ons, and calculations of loan-to-value ratios in contracts including GAP agreements.

(4) Copies of all cancellation requests, proof of refunds of downpayments or other consideration provided in the purchase of a vehicle, and proof of return of trade-in vehicles.

(5) Copies of all written complaints sent by car buyers or lessees to the dealer relating to sales, financing, leasing, or cancellation requests under Section 1784.43, written inquiries related to add-ons, and written inquiries and responses about vehicles referenced in Section 1784.41. For the purposes of this paragraph, “complaints” does not include responses to customer surveys or reviews, or testimonials posted on the internet.

(b) A
 dealer subject to this part may keep the records required by subdivision (a) in any legible form, and in the same manner, format, or place as they already keep records in the ordinary course of business. Failure to keep all records required under subdivision
 (a) is a violation of this title. 

(c) This section does not limit the requirements imposed by Section 2984.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 1.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 1784.28.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.6. CONSUMER CREDIT REPORTING AGENCIES ACT [1785.1. - 1785.36.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [1785.1. - 1785.6.]

1785.1.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) An elaborate mechanism has been developed for investigating and evaluating the credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, and general reputation of consumers.

(b) Consumer credit reporting agencies have assumed a vital role in assembling and evaluating consumer credit and other information on consumers.

(c) There is a need to insure that consumer credit reporting agencies exercise their grave
responsibilities with fairness, impartiality, and a respect for the consumer’s right to privacy.

(d) It is the purpose of this title to require that consumer credit reporting agencies adopt reasonable procedures for meeting the needs of commerce for consumer credit, personnel, insurance, hiring of a dwelling unit, and other information in a manner which is fair and equitable to the consumer, with regard to the confidentiality, accuracy, relevancy, and proper utilization of such information in accordance with the requirements of this title.

(e) The Legislature hereby intends to regulate consumer credit reporting agencies pursuant to this title in a manner which will best protect the interests of the people of the State of California.

(f) The extension of credit is a privilege and not a right. Nothing in this title
shall preclude a creditor from denying credit to any applicant providing such denial is based on factors not inconsistent with present law.

(g) Any clauses in contracts which prohibit any action required by this title are not in the public interest and shall be considered unenforceable. This shall not invalidate the other terms of such a contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1127, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.2.

This act may be referred to as the Consumer Credit Reporting Agencies Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.3.

The following terms as used in this title have the meaning expressed in this section:

(a) “Adverse action” means a denial or revocation of credit, a change in the terms of an existing credit arrangement which is adverse to the interests of the consumer, or a refusal to grant credit in substantially the amount or on substantially the terms requested. “Adverse action” includes all of the following:

(1) Any denial of, increase in any charge for, or reduction in the amount of, insurance for personal, family, or household purposes made in connection with the underwriting of insurance.

(2) Any denial of employment or any other decision made for employment purposes which adversely affects any current or prospective employee.

(3) Any action taken, or determination made, with respect to a consumer (A) for an application for an extension of credit, or an application for the hiring of a dwelling unit, and (B) that is adverse to the interests of the consumer.

“Adverse action” does not include (A) a refusal to extend additional credit to a consumer under an existing credit arrangement if (i) the applicant is delinquent or otherwise in default under that credit arrangement or (ii) the additional credit would exceed a credit limit previously established for the consumer or (B) a refusal or failure to authorize an account
 transaction at a point of sale.

(b) “Consumer” means a natural individual.

(c) “Consumer credit report” means any written, oral, or other communication of any information by a consumer credit reporting agency bearing on a consumer’s credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity, which is used or is expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part, for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing the consumer’s eligibility for: (1) credit to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, or (2) employment purposes, or (3) hiring of a dwelling unit, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1940, or (4) other purposes authorized in Section 1785.11.

The term does not include (1) any report containing
 information solely as to transactions or experiences between the consumer and the person making the report, (2) any communication of that information or information from a credit application by a consumer that is internal within the organization that is the person making the report or that is made to an entity owned by, or affiliated by corporate control with, that person; provided that the consumer is informed by means of a clear and conspicuous written disclosure that information contained in the credit application may be provided to these persons; however, where a credit application is taken by telephone, disclosure shall initially be given orally at the time the application is taken, and a clear and conspicuous written disclosure shall be made to the consumer in the first written communication to that consumer after the application is taken, (3) any authorization or approval of a specific
 extension of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar device, (4) any report by a person conveying a decision whether to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to a consumer in response to a request by a third party, if the third party advises the consumer of the name and address of the person to whom the request was made and the person makes the disclosures to the consumer required under Section 1785.20, (5) any report containing information solely on a consumer’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living which is obtained through personal interviews with neighbors, friends, or associates of the consumer reported on, or others with whom the consumer is acquainted or who may have knowledge concerning those items of information, (6) any communication about a consumer in connection with a credit transaction which is
 not initiated by the consumer, between persons who are affiliated (as defined in Section 150 of the Corporations Code) by common ownership or common corporate control (as defined by Section 160 of the Corporations Code), if either of those persons has complied with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1785.20.1 with respect to a prequalifying report from which the information communicated is taken and provided the consumer has consented to the provision and use of the prequalifying report in writing, or (7) any consumer credit report furnished for use in connection with a transaction which consists of an extension of credit to be used solely for a commercial purpose.

(d) “Consumer credit reporting agency” means any person who, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in
 the business of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer credit reports to third parties, but does not include any governmental agency whose records are maintained primarily for traffic safety, law enforcement, or licensing purposes.

(e) “Credit transaction that is not initiated by the consumer” does not include the use of a consumer credit report by an assignee for collection or by a person with which the consumer has an account for purposes of (1) reviewing the account or (2) collecting the account. For purposes of this subdivision, “reviewing the account” includes activities related to account maintenance and monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades and enhancements.

(f) “Employment purposes,” when used in connection with a consumer credit report, means a report used for the purpose of evaluating a consumer for employment, promotion, reassignment, or retention as an employee.

(g) “File,” when used in connection with information on any consumer, means all of the information on that consumer recorded and retained by a consumer credit reporting agency, regardless of how the information is stored.

(h) “Firm offer of credit” means any offer of credit to a consumer that will be honored if, based on information in a consumer credit report on the consumer and other information bearing on the creditworthiness of the consumer, the consumer is determined to meet the criteria used to select the consumer for the offer and the consumer is
 able to provide any real property collateral specified in the offer. For purposes of this subdivision, the phrase “other information bearing on the creditworthiness of the consumer” means information that the person making the offer is permitted to consider pursuant to any rule, regulation, or formal written policy statement relating to the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.), promulgated by the Federal Trade Commission or any federal bank regulatory agency.

(i) “Item of information” means any of one or more informative entries in a credit report which causes a creditor to deny credit to an applicant or increase the cost of credit to an applicant or deny an applicant a checking account with a bank or other financial institution.

(j) (1) “Medical debt” means a debt owed by a consumer to a person whose primary business is providing medical services, products, or devices, or to the person’s agent or assignee, for the provision of medical services, products, or devices. Medical debt includes, but is not limited to, medical bills that are not past due or that have been paid.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “medical service, product, or device” does not include cosmetic surgery, as defined in Section 1367.63 of the Health and Safety Code, and includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Any service, drug, medication, product, or device sold, offered, or provided to a patient by either of the following:

(i) A
 person or facility licensed under Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code, except for Chapters 3.35 (commencing with Section 1596.60) to 3.65 (commencing with Section 1597.70), inclusive, of that division.

(ii) A person licensed under Division 2 (commencing with
 Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, except for Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 4800) of that division.

(B) Initial or subsequent reconstructive surgeries, as defined in Section 1367.63 of the Health and Safety Code, and followup care deemed necessary by the attending physician and surgeon.

(C) Initial or subsequent prosthetic devices, as defined in Section 1367.635 of the Health and Safety Code, and followup care deemed necessary by the attending physician and surgeon.

(D) A mastectomy, as defined in Section 1367.635 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, trust, estate, cooperative,
 association, government or governmental subdivision or agency, or other entity.

(l) “Prequalifying report” means a report containing the limited information permitted under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1785.11.

(m) “State or local child support enforcement agency” means the Department of Child Support Services or local child support agency acting pursuant to Division 17 (commencing with Section 17000) of the Family Code to establish, enforce or modify child support obligations, and any state or local agency or official that succeeds to these responsibilities under a successor statute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 520, Sec. 1.   (SB 1061)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.4.

Nothing in this title shall apply to any person licensed pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or to any employee of such person, unless such person is employed directly by a consumer credit reporting agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1271.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.5.

Any person who, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling, evaluating, or disseminating information on the checking account experiences of consumer customers of banks or other financial institutions is, with the exception of compliance with the requirements of Section 1785.10, subdivisions (c), (d), and (e), only with regard to the provision of the address and telephone number, subject to the same laws which govern consumer credit reporting
agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 236, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Operative January 1, 2003, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

1785.6.
